Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1553.01
Litter problem; surveys; department; grant funds; progress report.

Prior to April 5, 2007, in order to identify the litter problem more fully and to measure the progress made by the department, the department conducted, or granted funds to enable public or private agencies to conduct, a survey measuring the amount and composition of litter on the public highways, recreation lands, and urban areas in the state. The department shall conduct, or grant funds to enable public or private agencies to conduct, followup surveys on a sufficiently regular basis to provide meaningful measurement of the amount and composition of litter and the rate of littering. The results of these surveys shall be reported to the Governor.

Laws 2007, LB568, § 2.
September 30, 2025